Georgia, session 2025_26, HB373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 24 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding insurance, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
H. B. 373
- 1 -

LC 46 1057
"33-24-59.34.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Cost sharing requirement' means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or a
maximum limitation on the application of a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other
out-of-pocket expense.
(2) 'Health benefit policy' means any individual or group plan, policy, or contract for
healthcare services issued, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state which
provides major medical benefits by a healthcare corporation, health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, accident and sickness insurer, fraternal
benefit society, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, or other insurer
or similar entity.
(3) 'Men with a family history of prostate cancer' means men who have a first-degree
relative:
(A) Who has been diagnosed with prostate cancer;
(B) Who developed prostate cancer;
(C) Whose death was a result of prostate cancer;
(D) Who has been diagnosed with a cancer known to be associated with an increased
risk of prostate cancer; or
(E) Who has a genetic alteration known to be associated with an increased risk of
prostate cancer.
(4) 'Men with a high risk for prostate cancer' means:
(A) Men who are 40 to 49 years of age with a family history of prostate cancer;
(B) Men who are 50 years of age and older; and
(C) Other men, as may be determined by a physician.
(b) A health benefit policy shall provide coverage for annual prostate cancer screenings
for men with a high risk for prostate cancer. Such coverage shall include a digital rectal
examination and a prostate-specific antigen test.
H. B. 373
- 2 -

LC 46 1057
(c)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a health benefit policy that
provides coverage for annual prostate cancer screenings shall provide such coverage
without imposing a cost sharing requirement on the enrollee.
(2) If compliance with paragraph (l) of this subsection would result in a high deductible
health benefit policy with a health savings account becoming ineligible under Section 233
of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code, then paragraph (l) of this subsection shall apply
to such policy only after the policy enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible
required under such section of the Internal Revenue Code except with respect to items or
services that are deemed preventive care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 223(c)(2)(C) of
the Internal Revenue Code, as such sections of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code are
in effect on January 1, 2025, or as the Commissioner shall determine necessary."
SECTION 2.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to state employees' health insurance plan, is amended by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
"45-18-4.2.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Cost sharing requirement' means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or a
maximum limitation on the application of a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other
out-of-pocket expense.
(2) 'Men with a family history of prostate cancer' means men who have a first-degree
relative:
(A) Who has been diagnosed with prostate cancer;
(B) Who developed prostate cancer;
(C) Whose death was a result of prostate cancer;
H. B. 373
- 3 -

LC 46 1057
(D) Who has been diagnosed with a cancer known to be associated with an increased
risk of prostate cancer; or
(E) Who has a genetic alteration known to be associated with an increased risk of
prostate cancer.
(3) 'Men with a high risk for prostate cancer' means:
(A) Men who are 40 to 49 years of age with a family history of prostate cancer;
(B) Men who are 50 years of age and older; and
(C) Other men, as may be determined by a physician.
(b) The health insurance plan established pursuant to this article shall include coverage for
annual prostate cancer screenings for men with a high risk for prostate cancer. Such
coverage shall include a digital rectal examination and a prostate-specific antigen test.
(c)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a health insurance plan that
provides coverage for annual prostate cancer screenings shall provide such coverage
without imposing a cost sharing requirement on the enrollee.
(2) If compliance with paragraph (l) of this subsection would result in a high deductible
health insurance plan established pursuant to this article with a health savings account
becoming ineligible under Section 233 of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code, then
paragraph (l) of this subsection shall apply to such plan only after the plan enrollee has
satisfied the minimum deductible required under such section of the Internal Revenue
Code except with respect to items or services that are deemed preventive care pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, as such sections of
Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code are in effect on January 1, 2025, or as the
Commissioner of the Department of Community Health shall determine necessary."
SECTION 3.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 373
- 4 -

LC 46 1057
"49-4-159.5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Cost sharing requirement' means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or a
maximum limitation on the application of a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other
out-of-pocket expense.
(2) 'Men with a family history of prostate cancer' means men who have a first-degree
100 relative:
101 (A) Who has been diagnosed with prostate cancer;
102 (B) Who developed prostate cancer;
103 (C) Whose death was a result of prostate cancer;
104 (D) Who has been diagnosed with a cancer known to be associated with an increased
105 risk of prostate cancer: or
106 (E) Who has a genetic alteration known to be associated with an increased risk of
107 prostate cancer.
108 (3) 'Men with a high risk for prostate cancer' means:
109 (A) Men who are 40 to 49 years of age with a family history of prostate cancer;
110 (B) Men who are 50 years of age and older; and
111 (C) Other men, as may be determined by a physician.
112 (b) The department shall provide Medicaid recipients who are men with a high risk for
113 prostate cancer with coverage for annual prostate screenings and do so without imposing
114 a cost sharing requirement on the enrollee. Such coverage shall include a digital rectal
115 examination and a prostate-specific antigen test.
116 (c) To implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall, when
117 necessary, submit a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request to the United States
118 Department of Health and Human Services."
H. B. 373
- 5 -

LC 46 1057
119 SECTION 4.
120 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
121 without such approval and shall apply to all applicable insurance policies issued, delivered,
122 issued for delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026.
123 SECTION 5.
124 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 373
- 6 -